Utah statutes.
75-2-708.   Class gifts to "descendants," "issue," or "heirs of the body" --
Form of distribution if none specified.
If a class gift in favor of "descendants," "issue," or "heirs of the body"
does not specify the manner in which the property is to be distributed among
the class members, the property is distributed among the class members who are
living when the interest is to take effect in possession or enjoyment, in such
shares as they would receive, under the applicable law of intestate
succession, if the designated ancestor had then died intestate owning the
subject matter of the class gift.
